Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska87-127
Intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the Trademark Registration Act provide a system of state trademark registration and protection substantially consistent with the federal system of trademark registration and protection under the federal Trademark Act of 1946, as amended. To that end, the construction given the federal act should be examined as persuasive authority for interpreting and construing the Trademark Registration Act.

Laws 2000, LB 626, § 2.

The construction given the federal Trademark Act of 1946 as amended (Lanham Trade-Mark Act) should be examined as persuasive authority for interpreting and construing the Trademark Registration Act. ADT Security Servs. v. A/C Security Systems, 15 Neb. App. 666, 736 N.W.2d 737 (2007).

The Lanham Trade-Mark Act provides that a party can recover the infringer's profits, any damages sustained, and the costs of the action. ADT Security Servs. v. A/C Security Systems, 15 Neb. App. 666, 736 N.W.2d 737 (2007).